Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.550

Police forces for universities and The Evergreen State College—Authorized.

The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards of trustees of the regional universities or of The Evergreen State College, acting independently and each on behalf of its own institution:

(1) May each establish a police force for its own institution, which force shall function under such conditions and regulations as the board prescribes; and

(2) May supply appropriate badges and uniforms indicating the positions and authority of the members of such police force.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.550. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 16 s 1; 1949 c 123 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4543-16. Formerly RCW 28.76.310.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.